Massachusetts, session 194th, H3081.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Subsection (b) of part B of section 3 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after clause (5) the
following clause:-
(6) (A) For purposes of this clause, “taxable pension income” shall mean pension income
that is taxable under section 2.
(B) A taxpayer shall be exempt from the tax under this chapter on the first $20,000 of
taxable pension income.
(C) A taxpayer shall be exempt from the tax under this chapter on 100 per cent of taxable
pension income if the taxpayer has paid over 20 years of tax on taxable pension income.
(D) For the purposes of this clause the taxpayer shall be:
of 2

(i) a resident of the commonwealth;
(ii) over the age of 65; and
(iii) at or below the area median income where the taxpayer resides as defined by the
Department of Housing and Community Development.
of 2